Connecticut, session 2026, HB05161.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Section 47a-6a of the general statutes is repealed and the
following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) As used in this section: [,]
(1) ["address"] "Address" means a location as described by the full
street number, if any, the street name, the city or town, and the state,
and not a mailing address such as a post office box; [,]
(2) ["dwelling unit"] "Dwelling unit" means any house or building, or
portion thereof, which is rented, leased or hired out to be occupied, or
is arranged or designed to be occupied, or is occupied, as the home or
residence of one or more persons, living independently of each other,
and doing their cooking upon the premises, and having a common right
in the halls, stairways or yards; [,]
(3) ["agent in charge"] "Agent in charge" or "agent" means [one] an
individual who manages rental real [estate] property, including, but not
limited to, the collection of rents and supervision and maintenance of
such property, including for the purpose of compliance with state law
LCO 1 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5161
and local codes;
(4) ["controlling participant"] "Controlling participant" means an
individual [that] who exercises day-to-day financial or operational
control; [, and]
(5) ["project-based housing provider"] "Project-based housing
provider" means a property owner [who] that contracts with the United
States Department of Housing and Urban Development to provide
housing to tenants under the federal Housing Choice Voucher Program,
42 USC 1437f(o);
(6) "Identifying information" means proof of an individual's name,
date of birth, current residential address, motor vehicle operator's
license number or other identification number issued by any
government agency or government entity;
(7) "Nonresident owner" means an individual, corporation,
partnership, trust or other legally recognized entity that does not reside
at the rental real property and that is (A) an owner of such rental real
property, or (B) the controlling participant of the entity that owns such
rental real property; and
(8) "Population" means the number of persons according to the most
recent federal decennial census.
(b) Any municipality may, and any municipality with a population
of twenty-five thousand or more shall, require the nonresident owner or
project-based housing provider of occupied or vacant rental real
property to report to the tax assessor, or other municipal [office] officer
designated by the municipality, the current residential address of the
nonresident owner or project-based housing provider of such property,
if the nonresident owner or project-based housing provider is an
individual, or the current residential address of the agent in charge of
the building, if the nonresident owner or project-based housing
provider is a corporation, partnership, trust or other legally recognized
entity owning rental real property in the state. If the nonresident
LCO 2 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5161
[owners] owner or project-based housing [providers are] provider is a
corporation, partnership, trust or other legally recognized entity owning
rental real property in the state, such report shall also include
identifying information and the current residential address of each
controlling participant associated with the property. If such residential
address changes, notice of the new residential address shall be provided
by such nonresident owner, project-based housing provider or agent in
charge of the building to the office of the tax assessor or other designated
municipal office not more than twenty-one days after the date that the
address change occurred. If the nonresident owner, project-based
housing provider or agent fails to file an address under this section, the
address to which the municipality mails property tax bills for the rental
real property shall be deemed to be the nonresident owner, project-
based housing provider or agent's current address. Such address may
be used for compliance with the provisions of subsection [(c)] (d) of this
section.
(c) In addition to the residential address required pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section, any municipality with a population of
twenty-five thousand or more shall require the nonresident owner,
project-based housing provider or agent in charge, as applicable, to
report to the tax assessor, or other municipal officer designated by the
municipality, accurate identifying information concerning such
nonresident owner, project-based housing provider or agent in charge.
[(c)] (d) Service of state or municipal orders relating to maintenance
of such rental real property or compliance with state law and local codes
concerning such real property directed to the nonresident owner,
project-based housing provider or agent at the address on file, or
deemed to be on file in accordance with the provisions of this section,
shall be sufficient proof of service of notice of such orders in any
subsequent criminal or civil action against the owner, project-based
housing provider or agent for failure to comply with the orders. The
provisions of this section shall not be construed to limit the validity of
any other means of giving notice of such orders that may be used by the
state or [such] a municipality.
LCO 3 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5161
[(d)] (e) Any person who violates any provision of this section shall
have committed [an infraction] a violation and shall be fined not less
than two hundred fifty dollars nor more than one thousand dollars.
[(e)] (f) Any report provided to a tax assessor or other municipal
officer designated by the municipality pursuant to subsection (b) or (c)
of this section [on or after October 1, 2023,] shall be confidential and
shall not be disclosed under chapter 14.
Sec. 2. Subsection (a) of section 47a-7 of the general statutes is
repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October
1, 2026):
(a) A landlord shall: (1) Comply with the requirements of chapter
368o and all applicable building and housing codes materially affecting
health and safety of both the state or any political subdivision thereof;
(2) make all repairs and do whatever is necessary to put and keep the
premises in a fit and habitable condition, except where the premises are
intentionally rendered unfit or uninhabitable by the tenant, a member
of [his] such tenant's family or other person on the premises with [his]
such tenant's consent, in which case such duty shall be the responsibility
100 of [the] such tenant; (3) keep all common areas of the premises in a clean
101 and safe condition; (4) maintain in good and safe working order and
102 condition all electrical, plumbing, sanitary, heating, ventilating and
103 other facilities and appliances and elevators, supplied or required to be
104 supplied by him; (5) provide and maintain appropriate receptacles for
105 the removal of ashes, garbage, rubbish and other waste incidental to the
106 occupancy of the dwelling unit and arrange for their removal; [and] (6)
107 supply running water and reasonable amounts of hot water at all times
108 and reasonable heat except if the building which includes the dwelling
109 unit is not required by law to be equipped for that purpose or if the
110 dwelling unit is so constructed that heat or hot water is generated by an
111 installation within the exclusive control of the tenant or supplied by a
112 direct public utility connection; and (7) comply with the requirements
113 of section 47a-6a, as amended by this act.
LCO 4 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 5161
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 47a-6a
Sec. 2 October 1, 2026 47a-7(a)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(a)(6), "entity" was changed to "government entity" for
clarity, and in Section 1(a)(7) a reference to section 47a-1 was deleted as
redundant.
HSG Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 5 of 5